Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2787.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
There is hereby appropriated to the State Department of Health
from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the General Revenue
Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025,
the sum of Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) or so much thereof as
may be necessary to pay for legacy contracts associated with the
Choosing Childbirth Program.
SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

Passed the House of Representatives the 19th day of February,
2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 24th day of February, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2787 Page 2